Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,162
Validity of sections.

Sections 25-21,149 to 25-21,164, except sections 25-21,149 and 25-21,150, are hereby declared independent and severable, and the invalidity, if any, of any part or feature thereof shall not affect or render the remainder of sections 25-21,149 to 25-21,164 invalid or inoperative.

Laws 1929, c. 75, § 14, p. 259;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,153;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,162.